Missouri, session 2026, SB1605.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Section 195.017, RSMo, is repealed and one new
2 section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 195.017,
3 to read as follows:
1 195.017. 1. The department of health and senior
2 services shall place a substance in Schedule I if it finds
3 that the substance:
4 (1) Has high potential for abuse; and
5 (2) Has no accepted medical use in treatment in the
6 United States or lacks accepted safety for use in treatment
7 under medical supervision.
8 2. Schedule I:
9 (1) The controlled substances listed in this
10 subsection are included in Schedule I;
11 (2) Any of the following opiates, including their
12 isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers,
13 esters, and ethers, unless specifically excepted, whenever
14 the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers and salts is
15 possible within the specific chemical designation:
16 (a) Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl (N-(1-(1-methyl-2-
17 phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl)-N-phenylacetamide);

SB 1605 2
18 (b) Acetylmethadol;
19 (c) Acetyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
20 phenylacetamide);
21 (d) Acryl fentanyl (-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
22 phenylacrylamide);
23 (e) AH-7921(3,4-dichloro-N-[(1-dimethylamino)
24 cyclohexylmethyl] benzamide);
25 (f) Allylprodine;
26 (g) Alphacetylmethadol (except levoalphacetylmethadol,
27 also known as levo-alpha-acetylmethadol levothadyl acetate
28 or LAAM);
29 (h) Alphameprodine;
30 (i) Alphamethadol;
31 (j) Alpha-methylfentanyl (N-1-(alphamethyl-beta-
32 phenyl) ethyl-4-piperidyl) propionanilide; 1-(1-methyl-2-
33 phenylethyl)-4 ((N-propanilido) piperidine);
34 (k) Alpha-methylthiofentanyl (N-(1-methyl-2-(2-
35 thienyl) ethyl-4-piperidinyl)-N-phenylpropanamide);
36 (l) Benzethidine;
37 (m) Betacetylmethadol;
38 (n) Beta-hydroxyfentanyl (N-(1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-
39 4-piperidinyl)-N-phenylpropanamide);
40 (o) Beta-hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl (N-(1-(2-hydroxy-2-
41 phenethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl)-N-phenylpropanamide);
42 (p) Betameprodine;
43 (q) Betamethadol;
44 (r) Betaprodine;
45 (s) Clonitazene;
46 (t) Dextromoramide;
47 (u) Diampromide;
48 (v) Cyclopropyl fentanyl;
49 (w) Diethylthiambutene;

SB 1605 3
50 (x) Difenoxin;
51 (y) Dimenoxadol;
52 (z) Dimepheptanol;
53 (aa) Dimethylthiambutene;
54 (bb) Dioxaphetyl butyrate;
55 (cc) Dipipanone;
56 (dd) Ethylmethylthiambutene;
57 (ee) Etonitazene;
58 (ff) Etoxeridine;
59 (gg) 4-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl -(4-fluorophenyl)-N-
60 (1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide;
61 (hh) Furanyl fentanyl -(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
62 phenylfuran-2-carboxamide;
63 (ii) Furethidine;
64 (jj) Hydroxypethidine;
65 (kk) Ketobemidone;
66 (ll) Levomoramide;
67 (mm) Levophenacylmorphan;
68 (nn) 3-Methylfentanyl (N-(3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-
69 piperidyl)-N-phenylproanamide), its optical and geometric
70 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
71 (oo) 3-Methylthiofentanyl (N-((3-methyl-1-(2-
72 thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl)-N-phenylpropanamide);
73 (pp) Methoxyacetyl fentanyl (2-methoxy-N-(1-
74 phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide);
75 (qq) Morpheridine;
76 (rr) MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine);
77 (ss) MT-45(1-cyclohexyl-4-(1,2-diphenylethyl)
78 piperazine);
79 (tt) Noracymethadol;
80 (uu) Norlevorphanol;
81 (vv) Normethadone;

SB 1605 4
82 (ww) Norpipanone;
83 (xx) Ocfentanil N-(2-fluorophenyl)-2-methoxy-N-(1-
84 phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acetamide;
85 (yy) Ortho-fluorofentanyl (N-2-(1-phenethylpiperidin-
86 yl)propionamide); other name 2-fluorofentanyl;
87 (zz) para-fluorobutyryl fentanyl (N-4-fluorophenyl)-N-
88 (1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide;
89 (aaa) Para-fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-(2-
90 phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl) propanamide;
91 (bbb) PEPAP (1-(2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-
92 acetoxypiperidine);
93 (ccc) Phenadoxone;
94 (ddd) Phenampromide;
95 (eee) Phenomorphan;
96 (fff) Phenoperidine;
97 (ggg) Piritramide;
98 (hhh) Proheptazine;
99 (iii) Properidine;
100 (jjj) Propiram;
101 (kkk) Racemoramide;
102 (lll) Tetrahydrofuranyl fentanyl (N-(1-
103 phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenyltetrahydrofuran-2-
104 carboxamide);
105 (mmm) Thiofentanyl (-phenyl-N-(1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-
106 piperidinyl)-propanamide;
107 (nnn) Tilidine;
108 (ooo) Trimeperidine;
109 (3) Any of the following opium derivatives, their
110 salts, isomers and salts of isomers unless specifically
111 excepted, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers and
112 salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical
113 designation:

SB 1605 5
114 (a) Acetorphine;
115 (b) Acetyldihydrocodeine;
116 (c) Benzylmorphine;
117 (d) Codeine methylbromide;
118 (e) Codeine-N-Oxide;
119 (f) Cyprenorphine;
120 (g) Desomorphine;
121 (h) Dihydromorphine;
122 (i) Drotebanol;
123 (j) Etorphine (except hydrochloride salt);
124 (k) Heroin;
125 (l) Hydromorphinol;
126 (m) Methyldesorphine;
127 (n) Methyldihydromorphine;
128 (o) Morphine methylbromide;
129 (p) Morphine methylsulfonate;
130 (q) Morphine-N-Oxide;
131 (r) Myrophine;
132 (s) Nicocodeine;
133 (t) Nicomorphine;
134 (u) Normorphine;
135 (v) Pholcodine;
136 (w) Thebacon;
137 (4) Any of the following opiate similar synthetic
138 substances scheduled by the U.S. Drug Enforcement
139 Administration as substances that share a pharmacological
140 profile similar to fentanyl, morphine, and other synthetic
141 opioids, unless specifically excepted or unless listed in
142 another schedule:
143 (a) Butyryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
144 phenylbutyramide);

SB 1605 6
145 (b) U-47700 (3,4-Dichloro-N-[2-(dimethylamino)
146 cyclohexyl]--methyl benzamide).
147 (5) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation
148 which contains any quantity of the following hallucinogenic
149 substances, their salts, isomers and salts of isomers,
150 unless specifically excepted, whenever the existence of
151 these salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible
152 within the specific chemical designation:
153 (a) Alpha-ethyltryptamine;
154 (b) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
155 (c) 4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine;
156 (d) 2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
157 (e) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine;
158 (f) 2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine;
159 (g) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenyl) ethanamine;
160 (h) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-ethylphenyl) ethanamine;
161 (i) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-methylphenyl) ethanamine;
162 (j) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxy-4-nitro-phenyl) ethanamine;
163 (k) 2-(2,5-Dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine;
164 (l) 2-(4-Chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine;
165 (m) 2-(4-Ethylthio-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine;
166 (n) 2-(4-Iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl) ethanamine;
167 (o) 2-(4-Isopropylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)
168 ethanamine;
169 (p) 4-methoxyamphetamine;
170 (q) 5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
171 (r) 4-methyl-2, 5-dimethoxyamphetamine;
172 (s) 3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
173 (t) 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine;
174 (u) 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine;
175 (v) N-hydroxy-3, 4-methylenedioxyamphetamine;
176 (w) 3,4,5-trimethoxyamphetamine;

SB 1605 7
177 (x) 5-MeO-DMT or 5-methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine;
178 (y) Alpha-methyltryptamine;
179 (z) Bufotenine;
180 (aa) Diethyltryptamine;
181 (bb) Dimethyltryptamine;
182 (cc) 5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine;
183 (dd) Ibogaine;
184 (ee) Lysergic acid diethylamide;
185 (ff) Marijuana or marihuana, except industrial hemp;
186 (gg) Mescaline;
187 (hh) Parahexyl;
188 (ii) Peyote, to include all parts of the plant
189 presently classified botanically as Lophophora williamsii
190 Lemaire, whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; any
191 extract from any part of such plant; and every compound,
192 manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of the
193 plant, its seed or extracts;
194 (jj) N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
195 (kk) N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate;
196 (ll) Psilocybin;
197 (mm) Psilocyn;
198 (nn) Tetrahydrocannabinols naturally contained in a
199 plant of the genus Cannabis (cannabis plant), except
200 industrial hemp, as well as synthetic equivalents of the
201 substances contained in the cannabis plant, or in the
202 resinous extractives of such plant, or synthetic substances,
203 derivatives and their isomers, or both, with similar
204 chemical structure and pharmacological activity to those
205 substances contained in the plant, such as the following:
206 a. 1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their
207 optical isomers;

SB 1605 8
208 b. 6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their
209 optical isomers;
210 c. 3,4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol and their
211 optical isomers;
212 d. Any compounds of these structures, regardless of
213 numerical designation of atomic positions covered;
214 (oo) Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine;
215 (pp) Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine;
216 (qq) Thiophene analog of phencyclidine;
217 (rr) 1-[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl]pyrrolidine;
218 (ss) Salvia divinorum;
219 (tt) Salvinorin A;
220 (uu) Synthetic cannabinoids:
221 a. Any compound structurally derived from 3-(1-
222 naphthoyl)indole or 1H-indol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane by
223 substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring by
224 alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
225 cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-
226 morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted
227 in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted
228 in the naphthyl ring to any extent. Including, but not
229 limited to:
230 (i) AM2201, or 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(1-
231 naphthoyl)indole;
232 (ii) JWH-007, or 1-pentyl-2-methyl-3-(1-
233 naphthoyl)indole;
234 (iii) JWH-015, or 1-propyl-2-methyl-3-(1-
235 naphthoyl)indole;
236 (iv) JWH-018, or 1-pentyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;
237 (v) JWH-019, or 1-hexyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;
238 (vi) JWH-073, or 1-butyl-3-(1-naphthoyl)indole;

SB 1605 9
239 (vii) JWH-081, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-
240 naphthoyl)indole;
241 (viii) JWH-098, or 1-pentyl-2-methyl-3-(4-methoxy-1-
242 naphthoyl)indole;
243 (ix) JWH-122, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-methyl-1-
244 naphthoyl)indole;
245 (x) JWH-164, or 1-pentyl-3-(7-methoxy-1-
246 naphthoyl)indole;
247 (xi) JWH-200, or 1-(2-(4-(morpholinyl)ethyl))-3-(1-
248 naphthoyl)indole;
249 (xii) JWH-210, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-ethyl-1-
250 naphthoyl)indole;
251 (xiii) JWH-398, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-chloro-1-
252 naphthoyl)indole;
253 b. Any compound structurally derived from 3-(1-
254 naphthoyl)pyrrole by substitution at the nitrogen atom of
255 the pyrrole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl,
256 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
257 piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether
258 or not further substituted in the pyrrole ring to any
259 extent, whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to
260 any extent;
261 c. Any compound structurally derived from 1-(1-
262 naphthylmethyl)indene by substitution at the 3-position of
263 the indene ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl,
264 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
265 piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether
266 or not further substituted in the indene ring to any extent,
267 whether or not substituted in the naphthyl ring to any
268 extent;
269 d. Any compound structurally derived from 3-
270 phenylacetylindole by substitution at the nitrogen atom of

SB 1605 10
271 the indole ring with alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl,
272 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
273 piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether
274 or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent,
275 whether or not substituted in the phenyl ring to any
276 extent. Including, but not limited to:
277 (i) JWH-201, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-
278 methoxyphenylacetyl)indole;
279 (ii) JWH-203, or 1-pentyl-3-(2-
280 chlorophenylacetyl)indole;
281 (iii) JWH-250, or 1-pentyl-3-(2-
282 methoxyphenylacetyl)indole;
283 (iv) JWH-251, or 1-pentyl-3-(2-
284 methylphenylacetyl)indole;
285 (v) RCS-8, or 1-(2-cyclohexylethyl)-3-(2-
286 methoxyphenylacetyl)indole;
287 e. Any compound structurally derived from 2-(3-
288 hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol by substitution at the 5-position
289 of the phenolic ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl,
290 cycloalkylmethyl, cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-
291 piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether
292 or not substituted in the cyclohexyl ring to any extent.
293 Including, but not limited to CP 47, 497 and homologues, or
294 2-[(1R,3S)-3-hydroxycyclohexyl]-5-(2-methyloctan-2-
295 yl)phenol, where side chain n=5, and homologues where side
296 chain n-4,6, or 7;
297 f. Any compound containing a 3-(benzoyl)indole
298 structure with substitution at the nitrogen atom of the
299 indole ring by alkyl, haloalkyl, alkenyl, cycloalkylmethyl,
300 cycloalkylethyl, 1-(N-methyl-2-piperidinyl)methyl or 2-(4-
301 morpholinyl)ethyl group, whether or not further substituted
302 in the indole ring to any extent and whether or not

SB 1605 11
303 substituted in the phenyl ring to any extent. Including,
304 but not limited to:
305 (i) AM-694, or 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-3-(2-
306 iodobenzoyl)indole;
307 (ii) RCS-4, or 1-pentyl-3-(4-methoxybenzoyl)indole (SR-
308 19 and RCS-4);
309 g. CP 50,556-1, or [(6S,6aR,9R,10aR)-9-hydroxy-6-
310 methyl-3-[(2R)-5-phenylpentan-2-yl] oxy-5,6,6a,7,8,9,10,10a-
311 octahydrophenanthridin-1-yl] acetate;
312 h. HU-210, or (6aR,10aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6,6-
313 dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-
314 tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol;
315 i. HU-211, or Dexanabinol,(6aS,10aS)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-
316 6,6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-
317 tetrahydrobenzo[c]chromen-1-ol;
318 j. Dimethylheptylpyran, or DMHP;
319 (6) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation
320 containing any quantity of the following substances having a
321 depressant effect on the central nervous system, including
322 their salts, isomers and salts of isomers whenever the
323 existence of these salts, isomers and salts of isomers is
324 possible within the specific chemical designation:
325 (a) Gamma-hydroxybutyric acid;
326 (b) Mecloqualone;
327 (c) Methaqualone;
328 (7) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation
329 containing any quantity of the following substances having a
330 stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including
331 their salts, isomers and salts of isomers:
332 (a) Aminorex;
333 (b) N-benzylpiperazine;
334 (c) Cathinone;

SB 1605 12
335 (d) Fenethylline;
336 (e) 3-Fluoromethcathinone;
337 (f) 4-Fluoromethcathinone;
338 (g) Mephedrone, or 4-methylmethcathinone;
339 (h) Methcathinone;
340 (i) 4-methoxymethcathinone;
341 (j) (+,-)cis-4-methylaminorex ((+,-)cis-4,5-dihydro-4-
342 methyl-5-phenyl-2-oxazolamine);
343 (k) Methylenedioxypyrovalerone, MDPV, or 1-(1,3-
344 Benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(1-pyrrolidinyl)-1-pentanone;
345 (l) Methylone, or 3,4-Methylenedioxymethcathinone;
346 (m) 4-Methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone, or MPBP;
347 (n) N-ethylamphetamine;
348 (o) N,N-dimethylamphetamine;
349 (p) Quinolin-8-yl 1-pentyl-1H-indole-3-carboxylate (PB-
350 22; QUPIC);
351 (q) Quinolin-8-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-
352 carboxylate (5-fluoro-PB-22; 5F-PB-22);
353 (r) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4-
354 fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide (AB-FUBINACA);
355 (s) N-(1-amino-3, 3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-
356 1H-indazole-3-carboxamide (ADB-PINACA);
357 (8) A temporary listing of substances subject to
358 emergency scheduling under federal law shall include any
359 material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains
360 any quantity of the following substances:
361 (a) (1-pentyl-1H-indol-3-yl)(2,2,3,3-
362 tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone, its optical, positional,
363 and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
364 (b) [1-(5-fluoro-pentyl)-1H-indol-3-yl](2,2,3,3-
365 tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone, its optical, positional,
366 and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;

SB 1605 13
367 (c) N-(1-adamantyl)-1-pentyl-1H-indazole-3-
368 carboxamide, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers,
369 salts, and salts of isomers;
370 (d) 2-(4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-
371 methoxybenzyl)ethanamine, its optical, positional, and
372 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
373 (e) 2-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-
374 methoxybenzyl)ethanamine, its optical, positional, and
375 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
376 (f) 2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-
377 methoxybenzyl)ethanamine, its optical, positional, and
378 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
379 (g) 4-methyl-N-ethylcathinone, its optical,
380 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
381 isomers;
382 (h) 4-methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone, its
383 optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts
384 of isomers;
385 (i) Alpha-pyrrolidinopentiophenone, its optical,
386 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
387 isomers;
388 (j) Butylone, its optical, positional, and geometric
389 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
390 (k) Pentedrone, its optical, positional, and geometric
391 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
392 (l) Pentylone, its optical, positional, and geometric
393 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
394 (m) Naphyrone, its optical, positional, and geometric
395 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
396 (n) Alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone, its optical,
397 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
398 isomers;

SB 1605 14
399 (o) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-
400 (cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, its optical,
401 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
402 isomers;
403 (p) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-pentyl-1H-
404 indazole-3-carboxamide, its optical, positional, and
405 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
406 (q) [1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-yl](naphthalen-1-
407 yl)methanone, its optical, positional, and geometric
408 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
409 (r) N-[1-[2-hydroxy-2-(thiophen-2-yl) ethyl]piperidin-
410 4-yl]-N-phenylpropionamide, its isomers, esters, ethers,
411 salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
412 (s) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide,
413 its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and
414 salts of isomers;
415 (t) N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-
416 (cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, its optical,
417 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
418 isomers;
419 (u) methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-
420 carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate, its optical, positional,
421 and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
422 (v) methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-
423 carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate, its optical, positional, and
424 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
425 (w) N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-
426 3-carboxamide, its optical, positional, and geometric
427 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
428 (x) N-(1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(4-
429 fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, its optical,

SB 1605 15
430 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
431 isomers;
432 (y) methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-
433 carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate, its optical, positional,
434 and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
435 (z) methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-
436 carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate, its optical, positional,
437 and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
438 (aa) N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-
439 yl)propionamide, its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and
440 salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
441 (bb) methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-
442 carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate, its optical, positional, and
443 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers;
444 (cc) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
445 phenylcyclopropanecarboxamide, its isomers, esters, ethers,
446 salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
447 (dd) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
448 phenylpentanamide, its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and
449 salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
450 (ee) N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-
451 yl)butyramide, its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts
452 of isomers, esters, and ethers;
453 (ff) N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-
454 yl)butyramide, its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts
455 of isomers, esters, and ethers;
456 (gg) N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-
457 yl)isobutyramide, its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and
458 salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
459 (hh) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
460 phenylisobutyramide, its isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and
461 salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;

SB 1605 16
462 (ii) N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
463 phenylcyclopentanecarboxamide, its isomers, esters, ethers,
464 salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers;
465 (jj) Fentanyl-related substances, their isomers,
466 esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and
467 ethers. Fentanyl-related substance shall mean any substance
468 not otherwise listed under another Drug Enforcement
469 Administration Controlled Substance Code Number, and for
470 which no exemption or approval is in effect under section
471 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C.
472 Section 355, that is structurally related to fentanyl by one
473 or more of the following modifications:
474 a. Replacement of the phenyl portion of the phenethyl
475 group by any monocycle, whether or not further substituted
476 in or on the monocycle;
477 b. Substitution in or on the phenethyl group with
478 alkyl, alkenyl, alkoxyl, hydroxyl, halo, haloalkyl, amino or
479 nitro groups;
480 c. Substitution in or on the piperidine ring with
481 alkyl, alkenyl, alkoxyl, ester, ether, hydroxyl, amino or
482 nitro groups;
483 d. Replacement of the aniline ring with any aromatic
484 monocycle, whether or not further substituted in or on the
485 aromatic monocycle; or
486 e. Replacement of the N-propionyl group by another
487 acyl group;
488 (kk) Naphthalen-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-
489 carboxylate, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers,
490 salts, and salts of isomers (NM2201; CBL2201);
491 (ll) N-(1-amino-3-methyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-(5-
492 fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, its optical,

SB 1605 17
493 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
494 isomers (5F-AB-PINACA);
495 (mm) 1-(4-cyanobutyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-
496 indazole-3-carboxamide, its optical, positional, and
497 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (4-CN-CUMYL-
498 BUTINACA; 4-cyano-CUMYL-BUTINACA; 4-CN-CUMYLBINACA; CUMYL-
499 4CN-BINACA; SGT-78);
500 (nn) methyl 2-(1-(cyclohexylmethyl)-1H-indole-3-
501 carboxamido)-3-methylbutanoate, its optical, positional, and
502 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (MMB-CHMICA,
503 AMB-CHMICA);
504 (oo) 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-
505 pyrrolo[2,3-b]pyridine-3-carboxamide, its optical,
506 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
507 isomers (5F-CUMYL-P7AICA);
508 (pp) N-ethylpentylone, its optical, positional, and
509 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (ephylone, 1-
510 (1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(ethylamino)-pentan-1-one;
511 (qq) ethyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indazole-3-
512 carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate, its optical, positional,
513 and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (trivial
514 name: 5F-EDMB-PINACA);
515 (rr) methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-
516 carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate, its optical, positional,
517 and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (trivial
518 name: 5F-MDMB-PICA);
519 (ss) N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-
520 3-carboxamide, its optical, positional, and geometric
521 isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (trivial names: FUB-
522 AKB48; FUB-APINACA; AKB48 N-(4-FLUOROBENZYL));
523 (tt) 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H-
524 indazole-3-carboxamide, its optical, positional, and

SB 1605 18
525 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (trivial
526 names: 5F-CUMYL-PINACA; SGT-25);
527 (uu) (1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indol-3-yl)(2,2,3,3-
528 tetramethylcyclopropyl) methanone, its optical, positional,
529 and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (trivial
530 name: FUB-144);
531 (vv) N-ethylhexedrone, its optical, positional, and
532 geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (Other name:
533 2-(ethylamino)-1-phenylhexan-1-one);
534 (ww) alpha-pyrrolidinohexanophenone, its optical,
535 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
536 isomers (Other names: α-PHP; alpha-pyrrolidinohexiophenone;
537 1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)hexan-1-one);
538 (xx) 4-methyl-alpha-ethylaminopentiophenone, its
539 optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts
540 of isomers; (Other names: 4-MEAP; 2-(ethylamino)-1-(4-
541 methylphenyl)pentan-1-one);
542 (yy) 4'-methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinohexiophenone, its
543 optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts
544 of isomers (Other names: MPHP; 4'-methyl-alpha-
545 pyrrolidinohexanophenone; 1-(4-methylphenyl)-2-(pyrrolidin-1-
546 yl)hexan-1-one);
547 (zz) alpha-pyrrolidinoheptaphenone, its optical,
548 positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of
549 isomers (Other names: PV8; 1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1-
550 yl)heptan-1-one);
551 (aaa) 4'-chloro-alpha-pyrrolidinovalerophenone, its
552 optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts
553 of isomers (Other names: 4-chloro-α-PVP; 4'-chloro-alpha-
554 pyrrolidinopentiophenone; 1-(4-chlorophenyl)-2-(pyrrolidin-1-
555 yl)pentan-1-one);

SB 1605 19
556 (9) Khat, to include all parts of the plant presently
557 classified botanically as catha edulis, whether growing or
558 not; the seeds thereof; any extract from any part of such
559 plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative,
560 mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seed or extracts;
561 (10) 7-Hydroxymitragynine (methyl (E)-2-
562 [(2S,3S,7aS,12bS)-3-ethyl-7a-hydroxy-8-methoxy-2,3,4,6,7,12b-
563 hexahydro-1H-indolo[2,3-a]quinolizin-2-yl]-3-methoxyprop-2-
564 enoate) concentrated at a level above four hundred parts per
565 million on a dry-weight basis.
566 3. The department of health and senior services shall
567 place a substance in Schedule II if it finds that:
568 (1) The substance has high potential for abuse;
569 (2) The substance has currently accepted medical use
570 in treatment in the United States, or currently accepted
571 medical use with severe restrictions; and
572 (3) The abuse of the substance may lead to severe
573 psychic or physical dependence.
574 4. The controlled substances listed in this subsection
575 are included in Schedule II:
576 (1) Any of the following substances whether produced
577 directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of
578 vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical
579 synthesis, or by combination of extraction and chemical
580 synthesis:
581 (a) Opium and opiate; and any salt, compound,
582 derivative or preparation of opium or opiate, excluding
583 apomorphine, thebaine-derived butorphanol, dextrorphan,
584 nalbuphine, nalmefene, naloxegol, naloxone, and naltrexone,
585 and their respective salts, but including the following:
586 a. Raw opium;
587 b. Opium extracts;

SB 1605 20
588 c. Opium fluid;
589 d. Powdered opium;
590 e. Granulated opium;
591 f. Tincture of opium;
592 g. Codeine;
593 h. Dihydroetorphine;
594 i. Ethylmorphine;
595 j. Etorphine hydrochloride;
596 k. Hydrocodone;
597 l. Hydromorphone;
598 m. Metopon;
599 n. Morphine;
600 o. Oripavine;
601 p. Oxycodone;
602 q. Oxymorphone;
603 r. Thebaine;
604 (b) Any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation
605 thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any
606 of the substances referred to in this subdivision, but not
607 including the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium;
608 (c) Opium poppy and poppy straw;
609 (d) Coca leaves and any salt, compound, derivative, or
610 preparation of coca leaves, and any salt, compound,
611 derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically
612 equivalent or identical with any of these substances, but
613 not including the following:
614 a. Decocainized coca leaves or extractions of coca
615 leaves, which extractions do not contain cocaine or
616 ecgonine; or
617 b. Ioflupane;

SB 1605 21
618 (e) Concentrate of poppy straw (the crude extract of
619 poppy straw in either liquid, solid or powder form which
620 contains the phenanthrene alkaloids of the opium poppy);
621 (2) Any of the following opiates, including their
622 isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers,
623 whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers, and
624 salts is possible within the specific chemical designation,
625 dextrorphan and levopropoxyphene excepted:
626 (a) Alfentanil;
627 (b) Alphaprodine;
628 (c) Anileridine;
629 (d) Bezitramide;
630 (e) Bulk dextropropoxyphene;
631 (f) Carfentanil;
632 (g) Dihydrocodeine;
633 (h) Diphenoxylate;
634 (i) Fentanyl;
635 (j) Isomethadone;
636 (k) Levo-alphacetylmethadol;
637 (l) Levomethorphan;
638 (m) Levorphanol;
639 (n) Metazocine;
640 (o) Methadone;
641 (p) Methadone-Intermediate, 4-cyano-2-dimethylamino-4,
642 4-diphenylbutane;
643 (q) Moramide-Intermediate, 2-methyl-3-morpholino-1, 1-
644 diphenylpropane-carboxylic acid;
645 (r) Pethidine (meperidine);
646 (s) Pethidine-Intermediate-A, 4-cyano-1-methyl-4-
647 phenylpiperidine;
648 (t) Pethidine-Intermediate-B, ethyl-4-phenylpiperidine-
649 4-carboxylate;

SB 1605 22
650 (u) Pethidine-Intermediate-C, 1-methyl-4-
651 phenylpiperdine-4-carboxylic acid;
652 (v) Phenazocine;
653 (w) Piminodine;
654 (x) Racemethorphan;
655 (y) Racemorphan;
656 (z) Remifentanil;
657 (aa) Sufentanil;
658 (bb) Tapentadol;
659 (cc) Thiafentanil;
660 (3) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
661 which contains any quantity of the following substances
662 having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system:
663 (a) Amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts
664 of its optical isomers;
665 (b) Lisdexamfetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of
666 its isomers;
667 (c) Methamphetamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of
668 its isomers;
669 (d) Phenmetrazine and its salts;
670 (e) Methylphenidate;
671 (4) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
672 which contains any quantity of the following substances
673 having a depressant effect on the central nervous system,
674 including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever
675 the existence of those salts, isomers, and salts of isomers
676 is possible within the specific chemical designation:
677 (a) Amobarbital;
678 (b) Glutethimide;
679 (c) Pentobarbital;
680 (d) Phencyclidine;
681 (e) Secobarbital;

SB 1605 23
682 (5) Hallucinogenic substances:
683 (a) Any material or compound which contains any
684 quantity of nabilone;
685 (b) Dronabinol [(-)-Δ-9-trans tetrahydrocannabinol] in
686 an oral solution in a drug product approved for marketing by
687 the U.S. Food and Drug Administration;
688 (6) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
689 which contains any quantity of the following substances:
690 (a) Immediate precursor to amphetamine and
691 methamphetamine: Phenylacetone;
692 (b) Immediate precursors to phencyclidine (PCP):
693 a. 1-phenylcyclohexylamine;
694 b. 1-piperidinocyclohexanecarbonitrile (PCC);
695 (c) Immediate precursor to fentanyl: 4-anilino-N-
696 phenethyl-4-piperidine (ANPP);
697 (7) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
698 which contains any quantity of the following alkyl nitrites:
699 (a) Amyl nitrite;
700 (b) Butyl nitrite.
701 5. The department of health and senior services shall
702 place a substance in Schedule III if it finds that:
703 (1) The substance has a potential for abuse less than
704 the substances listed in Schedules I and II;
705 (2) The substance has currently accepted medical use
706 in treatment in the United States; and
707 (3) Abuse of the substance may lead to moderate or low
708 physical dependence or high psychological dependence.
709 6. The controlled substances listed in this subsection
710 are included in Schedule III:
711 (1) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
712 which contains any quantity of the following substances

SB 1605 24
713 having a potential for abuse associated with a stimulant
714 effect on the central nervous system:
715 (a) Benzphetamine;
716 (b) Chlorphentermine;
717 (c) Clortermine;
718 (d) Phendimetrazine;
719 (2) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation
720 which contains any quantity or salt of the following
721 substances or salts having a depressant effect on the
722 central nervous system:
723 (a) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation
724 which contains any quantity or salt of the following
725 substances combined with one or more active medicinal
726 ingredients:
727 a. Amobarbital;
728 b. Secobarbital;
729 c. Pentobarbital;
730 (b) Any suppository dosage form containing any
731 quantity or salt of the following:
732 a. Amobarbital;
733 b. Secobarbital;
734 c. Pentobarbital;
735 (c) Any substance which contains any quantity of a
736 derivative of barbituric acid or its salt;
737 (d) Chlorhexadol;
738 (e) Embutramide;
739 (f) Gamma hydroxybutyric acid and its salts, isomers,
740 and salts of isomers contained in a drug product for which
741 an application has been approved under Section 505 of the
742 federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;
743 (g) Ketamine, its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers;
744 (h) Lysergic acid;

SB 1605 25
745 (i) Lysergic acid amide;
746 (j) Methyprylon;
747 (k) Perampanel, and its salts, isomers, and salts of
748 isomers;
749 (l) Sulfondiethylmethane;
750 (m) Sulfonethylmethane;
751 (n) Sulfonmethane;
752 (o) Tiletamine and zolazepam or any salt thereof;
753 (3) Nalorphine;
754 (4) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
755 containing limited quantities of any of the following
756 narcotic drugs or their salts:
757 (a) Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per one hundred
758 milliliters or not more than ninety milligrams per dosage
759 unit, with an equal or greater quantity of an isoquinoline
760 alkaloid of opium;
761 (b) Not more than 1.8 grams of codeine per one hundred
762 milliliters or not more than ninety milligrams per dosage
763 unit with one or more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in
764 recognized therapeutic amounts;
765 (c) Not more than 1.8 grams of dihydrocodeine per one
766 hundred milliliters or not more than ninety milligrams per
767 dosage unit, with one or more active, nonnarcotic
768 ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;
769 (d) Not more than three hundred milligrams of
770 ethylmorphine per one hundred milliliters or not more than
771 fifteen milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active,
772 nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts;
773 (e) Not more than five hundred milligrams of opium per
774 one hundred milliliters or per one hundred grams or not more
775 than twenty-five milligrams per dosage unit, with one or

SB 1605 26
776 more active nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized
777 therapeutic amounts;
778 (f) Not more than fifty milligrams of morphine per one
779 hundred milliliters or per one hundred grams, with one or
780 more active, nonnarcotic ingredients in recognized
781 therapeutic amounts;
782 (5) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
783 containing any of the following narcotic drugs or their
784 salts: Buprenorphine;
785 (6) Anabolic steroids. Any drug or hormonal
786 substance, chemically and pharmacologically related to
787 testosterone (other than estrogens, progestins,
788 corticosteroids, and dehydroepiandrosterone) that promotes
789 muscle growth, except an anabolic steroid which is expressly
790 intended for administration through implants to cattle or
791 other nonhuman species and which has been approved by the
792 Secretary of Health and Human Services for that
793 administration. If any person prescribes, dispenses, or
794 distributes such steroid for human use, such person shall be
795 considered to have prescribed, dispensed, or distributed an
796 anabolic steroid within the meaning of this subdivision.
797 Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another
798 schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation
799 containing any quantity of the following substances,
800 including its salts, esters and ethers:
801 (a) 3ß,17ß-dihydroxy-5α-androstane;
802 (b) 3α,17β-dihydroxy-5α-androstane;
803 (c) 5α-androstan-3,17-dione;
804 (d) 1-androstenediol (3β,17β-dihydroxy-5α-androst-1-
805 ene);
806 (e) 1-androstenediol (3α,17β-dihydroxy-5α-androst-1-
807 ene);

SB 1605 27
808 (f) 4-androstenediol (3β,17β-dihydroxy-androst-4-ene);
809 (g) 5-androstenediol (3β,17β-dihydroxy-androst-5-ene);
810 (h) 1-androstenedione ([5α]-androst-1-en-3,17-dione);
811 (i) 4-androstenedione (androst-4-en-3,17-dione);
812 (j) 5-androstenedione (androst-5-en-3,17-dione);
813 (k) Bolasterone (7α, 17α-dimethyl-17β-hydroxyandrost-4-
814 en-3-one);
815 (l) Boldenone (17β-hydroxyandrost-1,4,-diene-3-one);
816 (m) Boldione;
817 (n) Calusterone (7β, 17α-dimethyl-17β-hydroxyandrost-4-
818 en-3-one);
819 (o) Clostebol (4-chloro-17β-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
820 (p) Dehydrochloromethyltestosterone (4-chloro-17β-
821 hydroxy-17α-methyl-androst-1,4-dien-3-one);
822 (q) Desoxymethyltestosterone;
823 (r) 4-dihydrotestosterone (17ß-hydroxy-androstan-3-
824 one);
825 (s) Drostanolone (17ß-hydroxy-2α-methyl-5α-androstan-3-
826 one);
827 (t) Ethylestrenol (17α-ethyl-17ß-hydroxyestr-4-ene);
828 (u) Fluoxymesterone (9-fluoro-17α-methyl-11ß,17ß-
829 dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
830 (v) Formebolone (2-formyl-17α-methyl-11α,17ß-
831 dihydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one);
832 (w) Furazabol (17α-methyl-17ß-hydroxyandrostano[2,3-c]-
833 furazan);
834 (x) 13ß-ethyl-17ß-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one;
835 (y) 4-hydroxytestosterone (4,17ß-dihydroxy-androst-4-
836 en-3-one);
837 (z) 4-hydroxy-19-nortestosterone (4,17ß-dihydroxy-estr-
838 4-en-3-one);

SB 1605 28
839 (aa) Mestanolone (17α-methyl-17ß-hydroxy-5α-androstan-
840 3-one);
841 (bb) Mesterolone (1α- methyl-17ß-hydroxy-[5α]-
842 androstan-3-one);
843 (cc) Methandienone (17α-methyl-17ß-hydroxyandrost-1,4-
844 dien-3-one);
845 (dd) Methandriol (17α-methyl-3ß,17ß-dihydroxyandrost-5-
846 ene);
847 (ee) Methasterone (2α,17α-dimethyl-5α-androstan-17β-ol-
848 3-one);
849 (ff) Methenolone (1-methyl-17ß-hydroxy-5α-androst-1-en-
850 3-one);
851 (gg) 17α-methyl-3β,17β-dihydroxy-5α-androstane;
852 (hh) 17α-methyl-3α,17β-dihydroxy-5α-androstane;
853 (ii) 17α-methyl-3β,17β-dihydroxyandrost-4-ene;
854 (jj) 17α-methyl-4-hydroxynandrolone (17α-methyl-4-
855 hydroxy-17β-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);
856 (kk) Methyldienolone (17α-methyl-17β-hydroxyestra-
857 4,9(10)-dien-3-one);
858 (ll) Methyltrienolone (17α-methyl-17β-hydroxyestra-
859 4,9,11-trien-3-one);
860 (mm) Methyltestosterone (17α-methyl-17β-hydroxyandrost-
861 4-en-3-one);
862 (nn) Mibolerone (7α,17α-dimethyl-17β-hydroxyestr-4-en-
863 3-one);
864 (oo) 17α-methyl-Δ1-dihydrotestosterone (17β-hydroxy-
865 17α-methyl-5α-androst-1-en-3-one) (a.k.a. '17-α-methyl-1-
866 testosterone');
867 (pp) Nandrolone (17β-hydroxyestr-4-ene-3-one);
868 (qq) 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3β,17β-dihydroxyestr-4-
869 ene);

SB 1605 29
870 (rr) 19-nor-4-androstenediol (3α,17β-dihydroxyestr-4-
871 ene);
872 (ss) 19-nor-4,9(10)-androstadienedione (estra-4,9(10)-
873 diene-3,17-dione);
874 (tt) 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3β,17β-dihydroxyestr-5-
875 ene);
876 (uu) 19-nor-5-androstenediol (3α,17β-dihydroxyestr-5-
877 ene);
878 (vv) 19-nor-4-androstenedione (estr-4-en-3,17-dione);
879 (ww) 19-nor-5-androstenedione (estr-5-en-3,17-dione);
880 (xx) Norbolethone (13β,17α-diethyl-17β-hydroxygon-4-en-
881 3-one);
882 (yy) Norclostebol (4-chloro-17β-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-
883 one);
884 (zz) Norethandrolone (17α-ethyl-17β-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-
885 one);
886 (aaa) Normethandrolone (17α-methyl-17β-hydroxyestr-4-
887 en-3-one);
888 (bbb) Oxandrolone (17α-methyl-17β-hydroxy-2-oxa-[5α]-
889 androstan-3-one);
890 (ccc) Oxymesterone (17α-methyl-4,17β-dihydroxyandrost-
891 4-en-3-one);
892 (ddd) metholone (17α-methyl-2-hydroxymethylene-17β-
893 hydroxy-[5α]-androstan-3-one);
894 (eee) Prostanozol (17β-hydroxy-5α-androstano[3,2-
895 c]pyrazole);
896 (fff) Stanolone (Δ1-dihydrotestosterone (a.k.a. 1-
897 testosterone)(17β-hydroxy-5α-androst-1-en-3-one));
898 (ggg) Stanozolol (17α-methyl-17ß-hydroxy-[5α]-androst-
899 2-eno[3,2-c]-pyrazole);
900 (hhh) Stenbolone (17ß-hydroxy-2-methyl-[5α]-androst-1-
901 en-3-one);

SB 1605 30
902 (iii) Testolactone (13-hydroxy-3-oxo-13,17-
903 secoandrosta-1,4-dien-17-oic acid lactone);
904 (jjj) Testosterone (17ß-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);
905 (kkk) Tetrahydrogestrinone (13ß,17α-diethyl-17ß-
906 hydroxygon-4,9,11-trien-3-one);
907 (lll) Trenbolone (17ß-hydroxyestr-4,9,11-trien-3-one);
908 (mmm) Any salt, ester, or ether of a drug or substance
909 described or listed in this subdivision, except an anabolic
910 steroid which is expressly intended for administration
911 through implants to cattle or other nonhuman species and
912 which has been approved by the Secretary of Health and Human
913 Services for that administration;
914 (7) Dronabinol (synthetic) in sesame oil and
915 encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in a United States
916 Food and Drug Administration approved drug product;
917 (8) The department of health and senior services may
918 except by rule any compound, mixture, or preparation
919 containing any stimulant or depressant substance listed in
920 subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection from the
921 application of all or any part of sections 195.010 to
922 195.320 if the compound, mixture, or preparation contains
923 one or more active medicinal ingredients not having a
924 stimulant or depressant effect on the central nervous
925 system, and if the admixtures are included therein in
926 combinations, quantity, proportion, or concentration that
927 vitiate the potential for abuse of the substances which have
928 a stimulant or depressant effect on the central nervous
929 system.
930 7. The department of health and senior services shall
931 place a substance in Schedule IV if it finds that:
932 (1) The substance has a low potential for abuse
933 relative to substances in Schedule III;

SB 1605 31
934 (2) The substance has currently accepted medical use
935 in treatment in the United States; and
936 (3) Abuse of the substance may lead to limited
937 physical dependence or psychological dependence relative to
938 the substances in Schedule III.
939 8. The controlled substances listed in this subsection
940 are included in Schedule IV:
941 (1) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
942 containing any of the following narcotic drugs or their
943 salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in
944 limited quantities as set forth below:
945 (a) Not more than one milligram of difenoxin and not
946 less than twenty-five micrograms of atropine sulfate per
947 dosage unit;
948 (b) Dextropropoxyphene (alpha-(+)-4-dimethylamino-1, 2-
949 diphenyl-3-methyl-2-propionoxybutane);
950 (c) 2-[(dimethylamino)methyl]-1-(3-
951 methoxyphenyl)cyclohexanol, its salts, optical and geometric
952 isomers, and salts of these isomers (including tramadol);
953 (d) Any of the following limited quantities of
954 narcotic drugs or their salts, which shall include one or
955 more nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients in sufficient
956 proportion to confer upon the compound, mixture or
957 preparation valuable medicinal qualities other than those
958 possessed by the narcotic drug alone:
959 a. Not more than two hundred milligrams of codeine per
960 one hundred milliliters or per one hundred grams;
961 b. Not more than one hundred milligrams of
962 dihydrocodeine per one hundred milliliters or per one
963 hundred grams;

SB 1605 32
964 c. Not more than one hundred milligrams of
965 ethylmorphine per one hundred milliliters or per one hundred
966 grams;
967 (2) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation
968 containing any quantity of the following substances,
969 including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers
970 whenever the existence of those salts, isomers, and salts of
971 isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:
972 (a) Alfaxalone;
973 (b) Alprazolam;
974 (c) Barbital;
975 (d) Bromazepam;
976 (e) Camazepam;
977 (f) Carisoprodol;
978 (g) Chloral betaine;
979 (h) Chloral hydrate;
980 (i) Chlordiazepoxide;
981 (j) Clobazam;
982 (k) Clonazepam;
983 (l) Clorazepate;
984 (m) Clotiazepam;
985 (n) Cloxazolam;
986 (o) Delorazepam;
987 (p) Diazepam;
988 (q) Dichloralphenazone;
989 (r) Estazolam;
990 (s) Ethchlorvynol;
991 (t) Ethinamate;
992 (u) Ethyl loflazepate;
993 (v) Fludiazepam;
994 (w) Flunitrazepam;
995 (x) Flurazepam;

SB 1605 33
996 (y) Fospropofol;
997 (z) Halazepam;
998 (aa) Haloxazolam;
999 (bb) Ketazolam;
1000 (cc) Loprazolam;
1001 (dd) Lorazepam;
1002 (ee) Lormetazepam;
1003 (ff) Mebutamate;
1004 (gg) Medazepam;
1005 (hh) Meprobamate;
1006 (ii) Methohexital;
1007 (jj) Methylphenobarbital (mephobarbital);
1008 (kk) Midazolam;
1009 (ll) Nimetazepam;
1010 (mm) Nitrazepam;
1011 (nn) Nordiazepam;
1012 (oo) Oxazepam;
1013 (pp) Oxazolam;
1014 (qq) Paraldehyde;
1015 (rr) Petrichloral;
1016 (ss) Phenobarbital;
1017 (tt) Pinazepam;
1018 (uu) Prazepam;
1019 (vv) Quazepam;
1020 (ww) Suvorexant;
1021 (xx) Temazepam;
1022 (yy) Tetrazepam;
1023 (zz) Triazolam;
1024 (aaa) Zaleplon;
1025 (bbb) Zolpidem;
1026 (ccc) Zopiclone;

SB 1605 34
1027 (3) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
1028 which contains any quantity of the following substance
1029 including its salts, isomers and salts of isomers whenever
1030 the existence of such salts, isomers and salts of isomers is
1031 possible: fenfluramine;
1032 (4) Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation
1033 which contains any quantity of the following substances,
1034 including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever
1035 the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers
1036 is possible: Lorcaserin;
1037 (5) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation
1038 containing any quantity of the following substances having a
1039 stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including
1040 their salts, isomers and salts of isomers:
1041 (a) Cathine ((+)-norpseudoephedrine);
1042 (b) Diethylpropion;
1043 (c) Fencamfamin;
1044 (d) Fenproporex;
1045 (e) Mazindol;
1046 (f) Mefenorex;
1047 (g) Modafinil;
1048 (h) Pemoline, including organometallic complexes and
1049 chelates thereof;
1050 (i) Phentermine;
1051 (j) Pipradrol;
1052 (k) Sibutramine;
1053 (l) SPA ((-)-1-dimethyamino-1,2-diphenylethane);
1054 (6) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation
1055 containing any quantity of the following substance,
1056 including its salts:
1057 (a) Butorphanol (including its optical isomers);

SB 1605 35
1058 (b) Eluxadoline (5-[[[(2S)-2-amino-3-[4-aminocarbonyl)-
1059 2,6-dimethylphenyl]-1-oxopropyl][(1S)-1-(4-phenyl-1 H-
1060 imidazol-2-yl)ethyl]amino]methyl]-2-methoxybenzoic acid)
1061 (including its optical isomers) and its salts, isomers, and
1062 salts of isomers;
1063 (c) Pentazocine;
1064 (7) Ephedrine, its salts, optical isomers and salts of
1065 optical isomers, when the substance is the only active
1066 medicinal ingredient;
1067 (8) The department of health and senior services may
1068 except by rule any compound, mixture, or preparation
1069 containing any depressant substance listed in subdivision
1070 (1) of this subsection from the application of all or any
1071 part of sections 195.010 to 195.320 and sections 579.015 to
1072 579.086 if the compound, mixture, or preparation contains
1073 one or more active medicinal ingredients not having a
1074 depressant effect on the central nervous system, and if the
1075 admixtures are included therein in combinations, quantity,
1076 proportion, or concentration that vitiate the potential for
1077 abuse of the substances which have a depressant effect on
1078 the central nervous system.
1079 9. The department of health and senior services shall
1080 place a substance in Schedule V if it finds that:
1081 (1) The substance has low potential for abuse relative
1082 to the controlled substances listed in Schedule IV;
1083 (2) The substance has currently accepted medical use
1084 in treatment in the United States; and
1085 (3) The substance has limited physical dependence or
1086 psychological dependence liability relative to the
1087 controlled substances listed in Schedule IV.
1088 10. The controlled substances listed in this
1089 subsection are included in Schedule V:

SB 1605 36
1090 (1) Any compound, mixture or preparation containing
1091 any of the following narcotic drugs or their salts
1092 calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in
1093 limited quantities as set forth below, which also contains
1094 one or more nonnarcotic active medicinal ingredients in
1095 sufficient proportion to confer upon the compound, mixture
1096 or preparation valuable medicinal qualities other than those
1097 possessed by the narcotic drug alone:
1098 (a) Not more than two and five-tenths milligrams of
1099 diphenoxylate and not less than twenty-five micrograms of
1100 atropine sulfate per dosage unit;
1101 (b) Not more than one hundred milligrams of opium per
1102 one hundred milliliters or per one hundred grams;
1103 (c) Not more than five-tenths milligram of difenoxin
1104 and not less than twenty-five micrograms of atropine sulfate
1105 per dosage unit;
1106 (2) Any material, compound, mixture or preparation
1107 which contains any quantity of the following substance
1108 having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system
1109 including its salts, isomers and salts of isomers:
1110 pyrovalerone;
1111 (3) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing
1112 any detectable quantity of pseudoephedrine or its salts or
1113 optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers or any
1114 compound, mixture, or preparation containing any detectable
1115 quantity of ephedrine or its salts or optical isomers, or
1116 salts of optical isomers;
1117 (4) Unless specifically exempted or excluded or unless
1118 listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture,
1119 or preparation which contains any quantity of the following
1120 substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous
1121 system, including its salts:

SB 1605 37
1122 (a) Brivaracetam ((25)-2-[(4R)-2-oxo-4-
1123 propylpyrrolidin-1-yl]butanamide) (also referred to as BRV;
1124 UCB-34714; Briviact);
1125 (b) Ezogabine [N-[2-amino-4(4-fluorobenzylamino)-
1126 phenyl]-carbamic acid ethyl ester];
1127 (c) Lacosamide [(R)-2-acetoamido-N-benzyl-3-methoxy-
1128 propionamide];
1129 (d) Pregabalin [(S)-3-(aminomethyl)-5-methylhexanoic
1130 acid];
1131 (5) Any drug product in finished dosage formulation
1132 that has been approved by the U.S. Food and Drug
1133 Administration that contains cannabidiol (2-[1R-3-methyl-6R-
1134 (1-methylethenyl)-2-cyclohexen-1-yl]-5-pentyl-1,3-
1135 benzenediol) derived from cannabis and no more than 0.1
1136 percent (w/w) residual tetrahydro cannabinols.
1137 11. If any compound, mixture, or preparation as
1138 specified in subdivision (3) of subsection 10 of this
1139 section is dispensed, sold, or distributed in a pharmacy
1140 without a prescription:
1141 (1) All packages of any compound, mixture, or
1142 preparation containing any detectable quantity of
1143 pseudoephedrine, its salts or optical isomers, or salts of
1144 optical isomers or ephedrine, its salts or optical isomers,
1145 or salts of optical isomers, shall be offered for sale only
1146 from behind a pharmacy counter where the public is not
1147 permitted, and only by a registered pharmacist or registered
1148 pharmacy technician; and
1149 (2) Any person purchasing, receiving or otherwise
1150 acquiring any compound, mixture, or preparation containing
1151 any detectable quantity of pseudoephedrine, its salts or
1152 optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers or ephedrine,

SB 1605 38
1153 its salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers
1154 shall be at least eighteen years of age; and
1155 (3) The pharmacist, intern pharmacist, or registered
1156 pharmacy technician shall require any person, prior to such
1157 person's purchasing, receiving or otherwise acquiring such
1158 compound, mixture, or preparation to furnish suitable photo
1159 identification that is issued by a state or the federal
1160 government or a document that, with respect to
1161 identification, is considered acceptable and showing the
1162 date of birth of the person;
1163 (4) The seller shall deliver the product directly into
1164 the custody of the purchaser.
1165 12. Pharmacists, intern pharmacists, and registered
1166 pharmacy technicians shall implement and maintain an
1167 electronic log of each transaction. Such log shall include
1168 the following information:
1169 (1) The name, address, and signature of the purchaser;
1170 (2) The amount of the compound, mixture, or
1171 preparation purchased;
1172 (3) The date and time of each purchase; and
1173 (4) The name or initials of the pharmacist, intern
1174 pharmacist, or registered pharmacy technician who dispensed
1175 the compound, mixture, or preparation to the purchaser.
1176 13. Each pharmacy shall submit information regarding
1177 sales of any compound, mixture, or preparation as specified
1178 in subdivision (3) of subsection 10 of this section in
1179 accordance with transmission methods and frequency
1180 established by the department by regulation;
1181 14. No person shall dispense, sell, purchase, receive,
1182 or otherwise acquire quantities greater than those specified
1183 in this chapter.

SB 1605 39
1184 15. All persons who dispense or offer for sale
1185 pseudoephedrine and ephedrine products in a pharmacy shall
1186 ensure that all such products are located only behind a
1187 pharmacy counter where the public is not permitted.
1188 16. The penalties for a knowing or reckless violation
1189 of the provisions of subsections 11 to 15 of this section
1190 are found in section 579.060.
1191 17. The scheduling of substances specified in
1192 subdivision (3) of subsection 10 of this section and
1193 subsections 11, 12, 14, and 15 of this section shall not
1194 apply to any compounds, mixtures, or preparations that are
1195 in liquid or liquid-filled gel capsule form or to any
1196 compound, mixture, or preparation specified in subdivision
1197 (3) of subsection 10 of this section which must be
1198 dispensed, sold, or distributed in a pharmacy pursuant to a
1199 prescription.
1200 18. The manufacturer of a drug product or another
1201 interested party may apply with the department of health and
1202 senior services for an exemption from this section. The
1203 department of health and senior services may grant an
1204 exemption by rule from this section if the department finds
1205 the drug product is not used in the illegal manufacture of
1206 methamphetamine or other controlled or dangerous
1207 substances. The department of health and senior services
1208 shall rely on reports from law enforcement and law
1209 enforcement evidentiary laboratories in determining if the
1210 proposed product can be used to manufacture illicit
1211 controlled substances.
1212 19. The department of health and senior services shall
1213 revise and republish the schedules annually.
1214 20. The department of health and senior services shall
1215 promulgate rules under chapter 536 regarding the security

SB 1605 40
1216 and storage of Schedule V controlled substances, as
1217 described in subdivision (3) of subsection 10 of this
1218 section, for distributors as registered by the department of
1219 health and senior services.
1220 21. Logs of transactions required to be kept and
1221 maintained by this section and section 195.417 shall create
1222 a rebuttable presumption that the person whose name appears
1223 in the logs is the person whose transactions are recorded in
1224 the logs.
✓